District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.03

Homeland Security Program.

(a)

The Director shall develop a Homeland Security Program to identify and mitigate threats, risks, and vulnerabilities within the District of Columbia. The program shall include, but not be limited to:

(1)

Identifying public infrastructure and other public assets in the District that need protection, assessing vulnerability, and addressing priority needs;

(2)

Establishing measurable readiness priorities and targets that balance the potential threat and magnitude of terrorist attacks, major disasters, and other emergencies with the resources required to prevent, respond to, and recover from them;

(3)

Establishing readiness metrics and performance measures for preparedness in the areas of prevention, protection, response, and recovery;

(4)

Assisting residents and public and private entities in emergency preparedness;

(5)

Coordinating with federal, state, and regional authorities, and with private entities; and

(6)

Developing a budget to implement the Program.

(b)

Within one year of March 14, 2007, the Director shall contract for a baseline threat and vulnerability assessment of the District of Columbia to include risks associated with, but not limited to, terrorism (including bioterrorism), radiological weapons and their potential transport into the District of Columbia, food and water supply, cybersecurity, fire and rescue capability; an assessment of actions already taken to address security issues and recommendations on whether additional safety and security enforcement actions are needed; and recommendations for additional legislation needed to enhance the security of District residents.

(c)

Beginning one year after the establishment of the Program, the Mayor shall submit an annual report to the Council describing the current level of the preparedness of the District of Columbia, including reports on the District’s homeland security capabilities, priority unmet needs and the cost of meeting those needs, relevant training and readiness exercises, resident education, and the utilization of mutual aid.

History

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 203
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2231.02.